Hawaii statutes.
[§432:1-107.5] Prohibition on
rescissions of coverage. (a) Notwithstanding sections 431:10-226.5 and
431:10A-106 to the contrary, a society shall not rescind coverage under a
health benefit plan with respect to an individual, including a group to which
the individual belongs or family coverage in which the individual is included,
after the individual is covered under the plan, unless:

(1) The individual or a person seeking coverage on
behalf of the individual performs an act, practice, or omission that
constitutes fraud;

(2) The individual makes an intentional
misrepresentation of material fact as prohibited by the terms of the plan or
coverage; or

(3) The individual fails to timely pay required
premiums or contributions toward the cost of coverage; provided that the
rescission is in compliance with federal regulations.

As used in this subsection, "a person
seeking coverage on behalf of the individual" shall not include an
insurance producer or employee or authorized representative of the health carrier.

(b) A society shall provide at least thirty
days advance written notice to each plan enrollee or, for individual health
insurance coverage, to each primary subscriber, who would be affected by the
proposed rescission of coverage before coverage under the plan may be rescinded
in accordance with subsection (a) regardless of whether, in the case of group
health insurance coverage, the rescission applies to the entire group or only
to an individual within the group.

(c) This section applies regardless of any applicable
contestability period. [L 2014, c 186, §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next